Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-3042
Law enforcement; contact method.

All controllable electronic record kiosk operators performing business in the state shall, at a minimum, have a dedicated method of contact for law enforcement to contact the controllable electronic record kiosk operator. This method of communications shall be monitored at least daily. The contact method shall be displayed and available on the controllable electronic record kiosk operator's website and shall be updated as necessary.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 11.